Massachusetts, session 194th, S3057.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 10 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
section 35TTT the following section:- 
SECTION 35UUU. (a) There shall be established and set up on the books of the 
commonwealth a separate fund known as the Assisted Living Residences Trust Fund. The fund 
shall be administered by the secretary of aging and independence. The secretary may use 
amounts credited to the fund to pay for: (i) assisted living certification unit staffing; (ii) assisted 
living certification compliance reviews; (iii) assisted living complaint and incident 
investigations; (iv) ombudsman services for residents of assisted living and residents’ families; 
(v) maintaining public-facing data, reporting and accountability measures; (vi) managing appeals 
of findings and fines; and (vii) oversight enhancements. 
(b) The fund shall consist of: (i) any revenues collected from certification application and 
renewal fees under subsection (b) of section 4 of chapter 19D; (ii) any revenues collected from 

of 5 13 fines under clause (iii) of subsection (a) of section 6 of said chapter 19D; (iii) any revenues or 
other financing sources directed to the fund by appropriation; (iv) any amount recovered by the 
commonwealth and credited thereto in connection with civil actions brought pursuant to section 
8 of said chapter 19D; (v) bond revenues or other money authorized by the general court and 
specifically designated to be credited to the fund; (vi) any income derived from the investment of 
amounts credited to the fund or repayment of loans from the fund; (vii) funds from public or 
private sources, including, but not limited to, gifts, federal or private grants, donations, rebates 
and settlements received by the commonwealth that are specifically designated to be credited to 
the fund; and (viii) all other amounts credited or transferred into the fund from any other source. 
The department shall seek to maximize fund revenues through federal money, matching funds 
and grants. Any unexpended balances in the fund at the end of the fiscal year shall not revert to 
the General Fund and shall be available for expenditures in subsequent fiscal years. Any fiscal 
year-end balance in the fund shall be excluded from the calculation of the consolidated net 
surplus pursuant to section 5C of chapter 29. The fund shall not be subject to appropriation. 
SECTION 2. Section 4 of chapter 19D of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following subsection:- 
(i) All certification application and renewal fees collected pursuant to this section shall be 
deposited into the Assisted Living Residences Trust Fund established in section 35UUU of 
chapter 10. 
SECTION 3. Section 6 of said chapter 19D, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
adding the following subsection:- 

of 5 34  (c) All fines collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Assisted Living 
Residences Trust Fund established in section 35UUU of chapter 10. 
SECTION 4. Section 8 of said chapter 19D, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
adding the following subsection:- 
(c) All civil penalties collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the 
Assisted Living Residences Trust Fund established in section 35UUU of chapter 10. 
SECTION 5. Subsection (a) of section 72W½ of chapter 111 of the General Laws, as 
appearing in the 2024 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after “long-term care 
facilities” the following words:- and assisted living residences as defined in section 1 of chapter 
19D of the General Laws. 
SECTION 6. Subsection (b) of said section 72W½ of said chapter 111, as so appearing, is 
hereby amended by inserting after “long-term care facilities” the following words:- and assisted 
living residences as defined in section 1 of chapter 19D of the General Laws 
SECTION 7. (a) there shall be a task force to study and make recommendations on 
creating and improving access to affordable assisted living residences. The task force shall meet 
not less than 5 times and shall hold not less than 1 public hearing. 
(b) The task force shall consist of the secretary of aging and independence, or their 
designee, who shall serve as chair; the secretary of housing and livable communities, or their 
designee; the assistant secretary for MassHealth, or their designee; the commissioner of public 
health, or their designee; the chairs of the joint committee on aging and independence, or their 
designees; 1 person to be appointed by the minority leader of the house of representatives; 1 

of 5 55 person to be appointed by the minority leader of the senate; a representative of the Massachusetts 
Housing Finance Agency; a representative of the Community Economic Development 
Assistance Corporation; a representative of Massachusetts Aging Access Association, Inc.; a 
representative of MassPACE, Inc.; a representative of LeadingAge Massachusetts, Inc.; a 
representative of the Massachusetts Assisted Living Association, Inc.; a representative of the 
Massachusetts Senior Care Association, Inc.; and 4 members to be appointed by the governor, 1 
of whom shall have expertise in developing affordable assisted living residences, 1 of whom 
shall have expertise in operating affordable assisted living residences, 1 of whom shall represent 
an organization that represents low-income tenants and 1 of whom shall be a resident or a family 
member of a resident of an assisted living residence. 
(c) In making recommendations, the task force shall consider issues including, but not 
limited to: (i) creating an operational definition of an “affordable assisted living residence”; (ii) 
identifying the target population and service needs of qualifying residences; (iii) creating a 
current inventory of qualifying residences; (iv) assessing the service, housing, and operational 
costs of qualifying residences; (v) identifying and evaluating any gaps in the continuum of care 
for older adults; (vi) estimating statewide need for qualifying residences; (vii) recommending 
sustainable “housing plus services” financing models for qualifying residences; (x) reviewing the 
financing and affordability models for the defined population in other settings; (xi) studying 
financing and affordability models for the defined population in other states; (xii) reviewing 
Medicaid supported options and subsidized housing options; (xiii) establishing a feasible 
affordability model for assisted living residences in commonwealth. 
(d) The task force shall submit a report of its findings, including any recommendations or 
proposed legislation necessary to carry out its recommendations, to the clerks of the senate and 

of 5 78 house of representatives, the joint committee on aging and independence, and the senate and 
house committees on ways and means, not later than December 31, 2027.